Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Retirement and Eligibility for a Retirement Allowance

47-2-110.
Retirement ages; application and eligibility for a retirement allowance.

Upon written application to the board of trustees, any member in service who has reached 60 years of age or who has 30 years of creditable service may retire on a service retirement allowance, provided that he or she has at least five years of creditable service; provided, further, that if he or she became a member after July 1, 1968, he or she has at least ten years of creditable service. The effective date of retirement shall be the first of the month in which the application is received by the board of trustees, provided that no retirement application will, in any case, be effective earlier than the first of the month following the final month of the applicant’s employment. Applications for retirement shall not be accepted more than 90 days in advance of the effective date of retirement. Separation from service pending approval of the retirement application shall not affect eligibility for a retirement allowance. The provisions of this subsection regarding the effective date of retirement shall apply to all persons making application for retirement on or after March 15, 1979, and to all persons who have made application prior to March 15, 1979, but to whom payments from the retirement system have not commenced as of that date. Each employer shall certify to the board of trustees the date on which the employee’s employment is or will be severed.

If the employee has not reached normal retirement age on the effective date of retirement, the employer shall certify that no agreement exists to allow the employee to return to service, including service as or for an independent contractor. Any return to employment or rendering of any paid service by such employee, including service as or for an independent contractor, for any employer within two consecutive calendar months of the effective date of retirement shall render the severance invalid, nullifying the application for retirement.

Normal retirement age, for purposes of the retirement system, shall be the date the employee has reached 60 years of age, provided that he or she has at least ten years of creditable service or the age of an employee on the date he or she attains 30 years of creditable service; provided, however, that the provisions of this paragraph are subject to change by future legislation in order to comply with federal regulations. For those members who are in service with the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety as an officer, noncommissioned officer, or trooper, officers and agents of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, conservation rangers of the Department of Natural Resources, or in the Department of Revenue as an alcohol and tobacco officer or agent, normal retirement age shall be the date the employee has reached 55 years of age, provided that he or she has at least ten years of creditable service. For purposes of Section 402(l) of the federal Internal Revenue Code regarding distributions from governmental plans for health and long-term care insurance for public safety officers, normal retirement age shall be the earliest date when the employee has satisfied the requirements for a retirement allowance under the retirement system. Except as provided under Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s right to his or her retirement allowance is nonforfeitable upon attainment of normal retirement age.

Reserved.

The board of trustees is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits to members or beneficiaries of the retirement system at a time and under circumstances not provided for in this chapter to the extent that such payment is required to maintain the retirement system as a “qualified retirement plan” for the purposes of federal income tax laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 5; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 349, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 160, § 4; Ga. L. 1957, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 283, § 4; Ga. L. 1957, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 54, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1356, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1015, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 338, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1487, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2178, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 554, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1010, § 1/HB 1020; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 17/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 424, §§ 1, 2/HB 916; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 16/SB 436; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72; Ga. L. 2020, p. 474, § 2/SB 176.

The 2009 amendments.

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in paragraphs (c)(2) and (c)(3). The second 2009 amendment, effective May 11, 2009, in subsection (a), designated the existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1), added the last two sentences in paragraph (a)(1), and added paragraph (a)(2); and rewrote subsection (c). See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

The 2010 amendments.

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in paragraph (a)(1), designated the existing provisions as subparagraph (a)(1)(A), in subparagraph (a)(1)(A), substituted “shall” for “will” in the third sentence and deleted “and that no agreement exists to allow the employee to return to service, including service as or for an independent contractor. Any return to employment or rendering of any paid service, including service as or for an independent contractor, for any employer within two consecutive calendar months of the effective date of retirement shall render the severance invalid, nullifying the application for retirement” following “severed” at the end, and added subparagraph (a)(1)(B); and, in paragraph (c)(3), added the proviso at the end and added subparagraphs (c)(3)(A) through (c)(3)(C). The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsection (b), which read: “(b)(1) Effective July 1, 1983, no member of the retirement system may be required to retire because of age except the following members:

“(A) Those employed as prison guards by the Department of Corrections;

“(B) Those employed by the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety as officers and troopers;

“(C) Those employed by the Department of Natural Resources as conservation rangers;

“(D) Those employed by the Department of Revenue as alcohol and tobacco officers or agents;

“(E) Those employed as officers or agents of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation;

“(F) Those employed by the Department of Transportation as enforcement officers prior to July 1, 2001;

“(G) Those employed by the Department of Motor Vehicle Safety as enforcement officers on or after July 1, 2001; and

“(H) Those employed by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles as parole officers as well as other employees of said board who possess the power of arrest.

“(2) Those members specified by paragraph (1) of this subsection who may be required to retire because of age shall be subject to the laws specifying retirement ages for the various classifications of such members or subject to the rules, regulations, or policies specifying retirement ages of the various state departments or agencies employing such members, provided such rules, regulations, or policies are in compliance with other laws of this state. Any state department or agency specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be authorized to employ or continue the employment of any member, regardless of age, with professional, scientific, or technical skills who is so certified to the board of trustees by the state department or agency.”; and redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (b) and (c), respectively.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, repealed and reserved former subsection (b), which read: “(b)(1) As used in this subsection, in addition to the definition provided in Code Section 47-2-1, the term ‘employer’ shall also include the retired member’s last employer which reported to the retirement system prior to the member’s effective date of retirement. Such term shall also include the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

“(2) Except as provided in this subsection, if a member accepts paid employment with or renders services for pay to any employer, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, after his or her retirement, payment of his or her retirement allowance shall be suspended and no contributions to the retirement system shall be made on account of such service either by that member or his or her employer, provided that, upon termination of such service, all rights shall vest in that member as if he or she had continued his or her option to retire.

“(3) The retirement allowance of a retired member who accepts employment with or renders services to any employer after his or her retirement shall not be suspended if the employee has attained normal retirement age or has not been employed by or rendered service for any employer for at least two consecutive calendar months and performs no more than 1,040 hours of paid employment or paid service, including, without limitation, service as or for an independent contractor, for the employer in any calendar year; provided, however, that return to service as or for an independent contractor shall not result in the suspension of an employee’s retirement allowance if the employing agency certifies to the board of trustees that:

“(A) The contracting entity has multiple employees;

“(B) The contracting entity has multiple contracts, and the contracts are not limited to employers, as such term is defined in Code Section 47-2-1; and

“(C) The contractual relationship with the employer was not created to allow a retired employee to continue employment after retirement in a position similar to the one he or she held before retirement.

“(4) Any employer that employs a retired plan member shall within 30 days of the employee’s accepting employment notify the board of trustees in writing stating the name of the plan member and the number of hours the employee is expected to work annually and shall provide such other information as the board may request. If the retired plan member performs more than 1,040 hours in any calendar year, the employer shall so notify the board of trustees as soon as such information is available. Any employer that fails to notify the board of trustees as required by this subsection shall reimburse the retirement system for any benefits wrongfully paid. It shall be the duty of the retired plan member seeking employment by the employer to notify the employer of his or her retirement status prior to accepting such position. If a retired plan member fails to so notify the employer and the employer becomes liable to the retirement system, the plan member shall hold the employer harmless for all such liability.”

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 17. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Editor’s notes.

In amending subsection (b), the 1984 Act enacted Code language referring to an effective date of July 1, 1983, for the provisions of subsection (b), although the 1984 Act itself, by not carrying a specific effective date clause, was to become effective July 1, 1984. See 1976 Op. Atty Gen. No. 76-76 for a finding that, if the substantive provisions of an amendment conflict with the effective date provisions of the Act effecting the amendment, the substantive provisions should be construed in a manner consistent with the effective date provisions of the Act.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-111.
Persons eligible to retire at age 55.

Any other provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any member employed by the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety as an officer, a noncommissioned officer, or a trooper; by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation as an officer or agent; by the Department of Natural Resources as a game warden; or by the Department of Revenue as an alcohol and tobacco officer or agent or as an officer or agent of the Special Investigations Unit shall be eligible to retire at age 55 if he or she has the minimum number of years of creditable service provided in Code Section 47-2-110, and upon retirement such member shall be paid not less than the service retirement allowance which would have been payable to such member upon service retirement at age 65 without a change in compensation and with the same number of years’ creditable service to which such member is entitled at the time of retirement.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1372, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 17/SB 436; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsection (a), which read: “(a) Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any member stated in subparagraphs (b)(1)(B) through (b)(1)(E) of Code Section 47-2-110 who is subject to the involuntary separation provisions of Code Section 47-2-123 and who retires upon or after attaining the age of 55, whether or not retirement at such age is required by law, shall upon application receive a retirement allowance which shall consist of:

“(1) In the case of a member with at least 20 years of service, the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 60 had the member continued in service to age 60 without further change in compensation;

“(2) In the case of a member with at least 25 years of service, 75 percent of the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 65 had the member continued in service without further change in compensation; or

“(3) In the case of a member with at least 30 years of service, the service retirement allowance which would have been payable upon service retirement at age 65 had the member continued in service without further change in compensation.

“Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, in the application of paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection relating to allowances other than for disability or death, projected retirement allowance computations shall be made on the basis of the member’s highest total monthly earnable compensation, as reflected by monthly contributions made during the last 24 calendar months in which the member had made contributions, except that no salary increase by adjustment in compensation in any manner in excess of 10 percent during the last 12 months of membership service shall be included in the projected computation.”; and deleted the former subsection (b) designation.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” near the middle of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-112.
Reemployment of retired members; required contributions from employers; suspension of retirement allowance.

As used in this Code section, and in addition to the definition provided in Code Section 47-2-1, the term “employer” shall include a retired member’s last employer which reported to the retirement system prior to the member’s effective date of retirement. Such term shall also include the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

If a member who retired under this chapter accepts paid employment with or renders services for pay to any employer, including, without limitation, services directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, after his or her retirement:

Such employer shall pay to the retirement system the employer and employee contributions required by this chapter for members; and

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, payment of such member’s retirement allowance shall be suspended.

Such member shall not receive creditable service as a result of such employment or rendering of services. Upon termination of such employment or rendering of services, all rights shall vest in such member as if he or she had continued his or her option to retire.

The retirement allowance of a retired member who accepts paid employment with or renders services for pay to any employer after his or her retirement shall not be suspended if the employee has attained normal retirement age or has not been employed by or rendered services for pay to any employer for at least two consecutive calendar months and performs no more than 1,040 hours of paid employment or paid service, including, without limitation, services directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, for the employer in any calendar year; provided, however, that return to service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor shall not result in the suspension of an employee’s retirement allowance or the requirement of an employer to pay to the retirement system the employer and employee contributions required by this chapter if the employing agency certifies to the board of trustees that:

The contracting entity has multiple employees;

The contracting entity has multiple contracts, and the contracts are not limited to employers, as such term is defined in Code Section 47-2-1; and

The contractual relationship with the employer was not created to allow a retired employee to continue employment after retirement in a position similar to the one he or she held before retirement.

Any employer that employs a retired plan member shall, within 30 days of the employee accepting employment, notify the board of trustees in writing of the name of the plan member and the number of hours the employee is expected to work annually and shall provide such other information as the board of trustees may request. If the retired plan member performs more than 1,040 hours in any calendar year, such employer shall notify the board of trustees of such as soon as such information is available. Any employer that fails to notify the board of trustees as required by this subsection shall reimburse the retirement system for any benefits wrongfully paid. It shall be the duty of the retired plan member seeking employment with the employer to notify the employer of his or her retirement status prior to accepting such position. If a retired plan member fails to so notify the employer and such employer becomes liable to the retirement system, the plan member shall hold such employer harmless for all such liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 474, § 3/SB 176.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.